incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS__خواند">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خواند</l><r>خواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خوانده</l><r>خواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خوانان</l><r>خواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خوان</l><r>خواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>خوان</l><r>خواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>خوان</l><r>خواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__خواست">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خواست</l><r>خواستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خواسته</l><r>خواستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خواهان</l><r>خواستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خواه</l><r>خواستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>خواه</l><r>خواستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>خواه</l><r>خواستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__خوابید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابید</l><r>خوابیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابیده</l><r>خوابیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابان</l><r>خوابیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خواب</l><r>خوابیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>خواب</l><r>خوابیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>خواب</l><r>خوابیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__خوابانید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابانید</l><r>خوابانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابانیده</l><r>خوابانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابانان</l><r>خوابانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابان</l><r>خوابانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>خوابان</l><r>خوابانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>خوابان</l><r>خوابانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__خواباند">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خواباند</l><r>خواباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابانده</l><r>خواباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابانان</l><r>خواباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خوابان</l><r>خواباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>خوابان</l><r>خواباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>خوابان</l><r>خواباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__خرید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خرید</l><r>خریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خریده</l><r>خریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خران</l><r>خریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خر</l><r>خریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>خر</l><r>خریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>خر</l><r>خریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__خاست">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خاست</l><r>خاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>خاسته</l><r>خاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خیزان</l><r>خاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>خیز</l><r>خاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>خیز</l><r>خاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>خیز</l><r>خاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__تپید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>تپید</l><r>تپیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>تپیده</l><r>تپیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>تپان</l><r>تپیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>تپ</l><r>تپیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>تپ</l><r>تپیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>تپ</l><r>تپیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="تپیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__تپید"/></e>
                            <e lm="خاستن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__خاست"/></e>
                            <e lm="خریدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__خرید"/></e>
                            <e lm="خوابانیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__خوابانید"/></e>
                            <e lm="خواباندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__خواباند"/></e>
                            <e lm="خوابیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__خوابید"/></e>
                            <e lm="خواستن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__خواست"/></e>
                            <e lm="خواندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__خواند"/></e>
